Hawaii, session 2026, SB734.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii is facing a shortage of social workers to help individuals in the State manage their mental health and cope with stressors in their everyday lives.  This shortage is concerning since social workers already have full caseloads and may be unable to provide additional services, which may in turn intensify the need for help and increase burnout among social workers.  The demand for social workers will likely continue to rise because individuals experiencing depression, anxiety, life transitions, and other mental health challenges will need social workers' support to address difficult or stressful life situations. The legislature further finds that some nonviolent incarcerated individuals may have experienced the need for social services or may have firsthand experience receiving services from social workers. These individuals may be uniquely qualified to enter the field of social work as assistants after undergoing training. The legislature also finds that to address the shortage of social workers and lack of social services in the State, providing social work training to nonviolent incarcerated individuals may help these individuals reintegrate into society once their period of incarceration is over. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require the department of corrections and rehabilitation, in collaboration with the department of human services, to develop and establish a social work training program to assist nonviolent incarcerated individuals in exploring a professional pathway in the practice of social work and becoming eligible to work as assistants to licensed social workers; and (2)  Appropriate funds. SECTION 2.  Chapter 353H, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§353H-     Incarcerated individuals; social work training program; established.  (a) The department shall develop and establish a social work training program, in collaboration with the department of human services, to assist nonviolent incarcerated individuals in exploring a professional pathway in the practice of social work and becoming eligible for employment as assistants to licensed social workers. (b) The department may coordinate with accredited institutions of higher education, private entities, and nonprofit organizations to provide training in social work to participating individuals. (c) The department shall establish rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this section." SECTION 3. The department of corrections and rehabilitation and department of human services shall jointly submit a report of the departments' progress in developing and establishing the social work training program pursuant to section 2 of this Act, along with findings, recommendations, and any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to develop and establish a social work training program to assist certain nonviolent incarcerated individuals in the area of social work pursuant to this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________